Maryland, session 2025, HB0161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–401.
(a) With the assistance of the county health department, each county board shall
provide:
(1) Adequate school health services;
(2) Instruction in health education, including the importance of physical
activity in maintaining good health; and
(3) A healthful school environment.
(b) The Department and the Maryland Department of Health jointly shall:
(1) Develop public standards and guidelines for school health programs;
and
(2) Offer assistance to the county boards and county health departments
in their implementation.
(c) (1) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, SHALL DEVELOP A COMPREHENSIVE HEALTH
EDUCATION FRAMEWORK.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL UPDATE THE COMPREHENSIVE
HEALTH EDUCATION FRAMEWORK IN THE MANNER AND AT THE TIME THE STATE
BOARD DETERMINES IS NECESSARY.
(3) THE COMPREHENSIVE HEALTH EDUCATION FRAMEWORK SHALL,
AT A MINIMUM, INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING TOPICS:

HOUSE BILL 161 3
(I) HEALTH PROMOTION;
(II) MENTAL AND EMOTIONAL HEALTH;
(III) SUBSTANCE ABUSE PREVENTION;
(IV) FAMILY LIFE AND HUMAN SEXUALITY;
(V) GENDER IDENTITY AND SEXUAL ORIENTATION;
(VI) SAFETY AND VIOLENCE PREVENTION;
(VII) SAFE AND APPROPRIATE SOCIAL MEDIA AND INTERNET
USE;
(VIII) HEALTHY EATING; AND
(IX) DISEASE PREVENTION AND CONTROL.
(4) (I) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL CREATE AN
AGE–APPROPRIATE CURRICULUM THAT IS CONSISTENT WITH THE COMPREHENSIVE
HEALTH EDUCATION FRAMEWORK.
(II) IN DEVELOPING A CURRICULUM UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH,
EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH A COMMITTEE COMPOSED OF EDUCATORS,
HEALTH EXPERTS, AND MEMBERS OF THE LOCAL COMMUNITY TO REVIEW AND
COMMENT ON WHETHER CURRICULUM MATERIALS ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE
COMPREHENSIVE HEALTH EDUCATION FRAMEWORK.
(5) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) AND (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH POLICIES, GUIDELINES, AND
PROCEDURES FOR A PARENT OR GUARDIAN TO OPT OUT OF THE FAMILY LIFE AND
HUMAN SEXUALITY TOPIC FOR THE PARENT’S OR GUARDIAN’S STUDENT IN EACH
GRADE IN WHICH THE TOPIC IS TAUGHT.
(II) THE COUNTY BOARD MAY NOT AUTHORIZE A PARENT OR
GUARDIAN TO OPT THE PARENT’S OR GUARDIAN’S STUDENT OUT OF EDUCATION
RELATING TO HIV AND AIDS PREVENTION.
(III) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL IDENTIFY APPROPRIATE
ALTERNATIVE LEARNING OBJECTIVES AND MEASURABLE GOALS THAT MEET STATE
AND LOCAL HEALTH EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS FOR THE TOPIC THE STUDENT’S

HOUSE BILL 161
PARENT OR GUARDIAN HAS ELECTED TO OPT THE STUDENT OUT OF UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(6) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 15, 2026, AND EACH JUNE 15 THEREAFTER,
EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT DESCRIBING
THE ACTIONS TAKEN BY THE COUNTY BOARD TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS
IN PARAGRAPHS (4) AND (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) (1) (i) Each county board shall designate a school health services
program coordinator.
(ii) A county board may authorize the county health department to
designate the school health services program coordinator.
(2) The school health services program coordinator shall:
(i) Implement State and local health policies in the public schools;
(ii) Ensure that public schools adhere to local health services
guidelines; and
(iii) Communicate State and local health policies to the parents and
guardians of public school students.
(3) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
county board shall grant the school health services program coordinator the authority to
carry out the provisions of this subsection.
(ii) The county board shall consult with a county superintendent
before any change in the hiring or termination of personnel in connection with a school
health services program.
(4) The Department shall conduct at least two meetings annually with all
school health services program coordinators in the State.
[(d)] (E) On or before December 1, 2015, and every 5 years thereafter, the
Department shall report to the Governor and, subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, to the General Assembly a summary of the information reported to the State
Superintendent during the COMAR certification process.
4–111.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 161 5
(2) “CONTENT STANDARDS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–202.1
OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “CURRICULUM RESOURCES” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–202.1 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(4) “CURRICULUM STANDARDS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
7–202.1 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) Subject to the applicable provisions of this article and the bylaws, basic
policies, and guidelines established by the State Board, each county board, on the written
recommendation of the county superintendent, shall:
(1) Establish curriculum guides and courses of study ALIGNED WITH THE
CONTENT STANDARDS DEVELOPED UNDER § 7–202.1 OF THIS ARTICLE for the schools
under its jurisdiction, including appropriate programs of instruction or training for
[mentally or physically handicapped children] CHILDREN WITH DISABILITIES; and
(2) Supply printed copies of these materials to any teacher or interested
[citizen] INDIVIDUAL.
(C) (1) IF THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT RECEIVES NOTICE OR
DETERMINES THAT A COUNTY BOARD HAS ESTABLISHED CURRICULUM GUIDES AND
COURSES OF STUDY CONTRARY TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT SHALL SEND A WRITTEN NOTICE OF
DISCREPANCY TO THE COUNTY BOARD.
(2) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE COUNTY BOARD RECEIVED
NOTICE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COUNTY
SUPERINTENDENT SHALL MEET WITH THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT TO:
(I) DISCUSS THE DISCREPANCIES IDENTIFIED BY THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) DEVELOP A CORRECTIVE PLAN, INCLUDING AN
IMPLEMENTATION TIMELINE, SUBJECT TO APPROVAL OF THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT.
(3) (I) IF THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT DETERMINES THAT THE
COUNTY BOARD HAS NOT SATISFACTORILY IMPLEMENTED THE CORRECTIVE PLAN
APPROVED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COUNTY BOARD
SHALL ADOPT AND USE THE CURRICULUM STANDARDS AND CURRICULUM
RESOURCES ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 7–202.1 OF THIS ARTICLE
ONLY IN SUBJECTS OR COURSES IDENTIFIED IN THE CORRECTIVE PLAN.

HOUSE BILL 161
(II) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT SHALL SEND A COUNTY
BOARD A WRITTEN NOTICE OF A DETERMINATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE END OF THE IMPLEMENTATION TIMELINE
APPROVED IN THE CORRECTIVE PLAN UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(III) A COUNTY BOARD SHALL SEND THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT WRITTEN CONFIRMATION OF RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, INCLUDING DOCUMENTATION OF THE
AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF THE COUNTY BOARD’S ADOPTION OF THE DEPARTMENT’S
CURRICULUM STANDARDS AND CURRICULUM RESOURCES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(4) IF A COUNTY BOARD FAILS TO ADOPT THE DEPARTMENT’S
CURRICULUM STANDARDS AND CURRICULUM RESOURCES AS REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE COUNTY
BOARD RECEIVED THE WRITTEN NOTICE FROM THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT
UNDER PARAGRAPH (3)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT
SHALL WITHHOLD STATE FUNDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 2–303 AND 5–205 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
[(b)] (D) A county board may give academic credit for the study of American Sign
Language.
7–202.1.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONTENT STANDARDS” MEANS THE STATEMENTS FOR THE
PROGRAM OF INSTRUCTION THAT DESCRIBE THE KNOWLEDGE AND SKILLS
STUDENTS ARE EXPECTED TO ATTAIN FOR EACH CONTENT AREA AND GRADE LEVEL.
(3) “CURRICULUM RESOURCES” MEANS GUIDANCE DOCUMENTS AND
FRAMEWORKS USED BY A COUNTY BOARD TO DEVELOP CURRICULA TO IMPLEMENT
CONTENT STANDARDS.
(4) “CURRICULUM STANDARDS” MEANS THE STATEMENTS THAT
OUTLINE APPROACHES TO LEARNING FOR EACH CONTENT AREA ACROSS GRADE
LEVELS.
(B) The Department shall, in consultation with experienced and highly effective
teachers, including teachers on the career ladder under Title 6, Subtitle 10 of this article,
develop CONTENT STANDARDS, curriculum standards, and curriculum resources for each

HOUSE BILL 161 7
subject at each grade level, that build on one another in logical sequence, in core subjects
that may be used by local school systems and public school teachers.
[(b)] (C) (1) The purpose of the curriculum standards and curriculum
resources developed under this section is to provide county boards with technical assistance
to inform high–quality instruction that will ultimately result in students meeting the college
and career readiness standards in the manner described under § 7–205.1 of this subtitle.
(2) The curriculum resources developed under this section shall include, for
each core subject at each grade level:
(i) Course syllabi;
(ii) Sample lessons for teachers to use as models;
(iii) Examples of student work that meet standards for proficiency;
(iv) Explanations of why student work examples meet proficiency
standards so that teachers know what student knowledge is required; and
(v) Curriculum units aligned with the course syllabi.
(3) In developing the curriculum resources under this subsection, the
Department:
(i) May use as a model a course or unit developed by a teacher in or
out of the State; but
(ii) Shall review each model course and unit for quality, using
accepted benchmarks such as approval by EdReports or Tier 1 and Tier 2 evidence–based
standards established by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act.
(4) The Department shall compile curriculum units in such a manner that:
(i) Complete courses are formed; and
(ii) When taken by a student in sequence, the student can achieve the
college and career readiness standard adopted under § 7–205.1 of this subtitle by the end of
grade 10.
[(c)] (D) The Department shall submit curriculum resources and curriculum
standards developed under this section to the State Board for adoption.
[(d)] (E) The State Board shall establish a system of assessments to ensure that
students are acquiring the knowledge contained in the curriculum standards in English,
Mathematics, Science, and History or Social Studies.

HOUSE BILL 161
[(e)] (F) (1) Using the assessments established under subsection [(d)] (E) of
this section, the Department shall identify low–performing schools.
(2) An Expert Review Team established under § 5–411 of this article, under
the supervision of the Department, shall visit schools identified under paragraph (1) of this
subsection according to the criteria established under § 5–411 of this article.
(3) If the Department, based on a recommendation of an Expert Review
Team, determines that a school’s low performance on assessments is, largely, due to
curricular problems, the school shall adopt the curriculum resources developed under this
section.
(4) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, this section does
not require a public school or county board to adopt the Department’s curriculum standards
and curriculum resources and may not be construed to restrict a county board’s authority to
adopt curricula under § 4–111 of this article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.